Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 06.20.310.
Effect of illegal interest rate.

A loan of the amount or value of $25,000 or less for which a greater rate of interest, consideration, or charge than is permitted by this chapter has been charged, contracted for, or received, wherever made, may not be enforced in the state, and every person participating in such a loan in the state is subject to this chapter.
This section does not apply to loans legally made in a state or territory of the United States that has in effect a regulatory small loan law similar in principle to this chapter.

History.

(§ 20(c) ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 13 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 63 SLA 1980)

Sec. 06.20.320.
Civil penalties.

A licensee or lender who, in the making or collection of a loan contract, does any act that violates AS

06.20.230

—

06.20.260

or

06.20.280

—

06.20.310

shall at the option of the commissioner reimburse the portion of the interest and charges in excess of that provided in those sections, or, in the case of repeated violations of those sections by the licensee, the commissioner may, upon a hearing, require the licensee to adjust the loan contract interest or other charges down to the contract interest limitation specified in AS

45.45.010(a)

.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

If a penalty for failure to comply with financing disclosure requirements under regulations adopted by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System is imposed by the federal authorities, the department may not impose a civil penalty under this section for the same act or omission.

History.

(§ 21 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 14 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 84 SLA 1979; am § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.330.
Exemptions.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 75 SLA 2002.]

This chapter does not apply to individual loans by

pawnbrokers where separate and individual loans do not exceed $750; in this paragraph, “pawnbroker” means a person who is regulated under AS

08.76.100

—

08.76.590

; or

loan shops where separate and individual loans do not exceed $500.

History.

(§ 22 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1981; am § 88 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 55 ch 75 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.20.340.
Regulations, rulings, demands, and findings; service of notice.

The department may adopt general regulations and make specific rulings, demands, and findings consistent with this chapter as may be necessary for the proper conduct of business and the enforcement of this chapter.

All notices required or authorized by this chapter to be given or served by the department may be given or served by registered mail and service is considered complete when a true copy is deposited in the post office properly addressed and stamped.

History.

(§ 23 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For prohibited practices and sanctions, see 3 AAC 1, art. 3.

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.350.
Amendment or repeal of chapter.

This chapter may be modified, amended, or repealed so as to effect a cancellation or alteration of a license or right of a licensee hereunder, but the cancellation or alteration may not impair or affect the obligation of a pre-existing lawful contract between a licensee and a borrower.

History.

(§ 24 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Sec. 06.20.360.
[Renumbered as AS 06.20.920.]

Sec. 06.20.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development or a designee of the commissioner;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“open-end loan” means a loan made by a licensee under this chapter under an agreement between the licensee and a borrower which provides that

the borrower may obtain advances of money from the licensee from time to time or the licensee may advance money on behalf of the borrower from time to time as directed by the borrower;

the amount of each advance and interest and charges will be added to the borrower’s open-end loan account and payments and other credits are deducted from that account;

interest will be computed on the unpaid principal balance or the average unpaid principal balance of the open-end loan account;

the borrower may pay all or any part of the unpaid principal balance of the borrower’s open-end loan account or, if the account is not in default, in monthly installments of fixed amounts as provided in the loan agreement; and

the agreement covers open-end loans under this chapter.

History.

(§ 15 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 84 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” in paragraph (1) and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in paragraph (2), in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 06.20.920.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Small Loans Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

06.20.360

. Renumbered in 1978.